Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.385

Agency as central service provider for state agencies.

(1) The agency shall conduct a needs assessment and develop a migration strategy to ensure that, over time, all state agencies are moving towards using the agency as their central service provider for all utility-based infrastructure services, including centralized PC and infrastructure support. State agency-specific application services shall remain managed within individual agencies.

(2) The agency shall develop short-term and long-term objectives as part of the migration strategy.

(3) This section does not apply to institutions of higher education.

[ 2024 c 54 s 18; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 220; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 736. Formerly RCW 43.41A.152.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.